District of Columbia statutes.
20-1105

Petition for purpose of distribution.

When two or more heirs or legatees are entitled to distribution of undivided interests in any property of the estate, the personal representative or one or more of the heirs or legatees may petition the Court, prior to the closing of the estate, to make partition. After notice to the heirs or legatees interested in the property being partitioned, the Court may partition the property, in accordance with the provisions of sections 16-2901 through 16-2925 . The Court may direct the personal representative to sell any property which cannot be partitioned without prejudice to the owners and which cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-1105.